Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.9447, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Misuse. new text end new text begin Misuse occurs when an employee uses earned sick and safe time for a purpose not covered by subdivision 1. Misuse is not subject to the protections provided to employees under sections 181.9445 to 181.9448. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.9447, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Pattern or clear instance of suspected misuse. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the timeline provided in subdivision 3, paragraph (a), an employer is permitted to require reasonable documentation from an employee when there is a pattern or clear instance of suspected misuse by the employee. new text end new text begin (b) A pattern or clear instance of suspected misuse includes: new text end new text begin (1) an employee repeatedly used earned sick and safe time on their scheduled work day immediately before or after a scheduled day off, vacation, or holiday; new text end new text begin (2) an employee repeatedly used increments of earned sick and safe time of less than 30 minutes at the start or end of a scheduled shift; new text end new text begin (3) an employee used earned sick and safe time on a day for which the employer previously denied the employee's request to take other paid leave; or new text end new text begin (4) documentation or other evidence that conflicts with the employee's claimed use of earned sick and safe time. new text end new text begin (c) An employer that requires reasonable documentation under this subdivision must do so in accordance with subdivision 3, paragraphs (b) to (f). new text end new text begin (d) An employer that requires reasonable documentation in accordance with this subdivision is not retaliating against an employee under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end